New Jersey, session 222, S3599.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Out of the amounts of federal government assistance provided to this State with regard to the coronavirus disease 2019 pandemic which may be available to improve the unemployment insurance program, $200 million shall be allocated to the Department of Labor and Workforce Development for information technology upgrades in the Division of Unemployment Insurance. In the event that federal funds are partially or fully unavailable, the funds shall then be allocated from the "New Jersey Debt Defeasance and Prevention Fund" for the purpose of funding capital construction projects, pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2021, c.125, b.    Within 60 days of the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.      )(pending before the Legislature as this bill), the department shall submit, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature an implementation plan to effectuate the provisions of this act. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.